Louisiana, session 2026, HB317.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:100.5(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§100.5. Alternative schools; establishment by local boards
* * *
E. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a student who is
enrolled in prekindergarten or kindergarten shall not be assigned to an alternative
school unless the student is either suspended or expelled for an infraction involving
drugs, weapons, assault, or battery as provided in R.S. 17:416.